District of Columbia statutes.
7-1803.07

Miscellaneous provisions.

(a)

A determination of the Mayor to not include or to remove from the Directory a Brand Family or Tobacco Product Manufacturer shall be subject to review in the manner prescribed by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

No person shall be issued a license or granted a renewal of a license to act as a Wholesaler unless that person has certified in writing, under penalty of perjury, that he or she will comply fully with this part.

(c)

The first report of Wholesalers required by § 7-1803.05(a) shall be due 45 calendar days after April 22, 2004; the certifications by a Tobacco Product Manufacturer described in § 7-1803.03(a) shall be due 45 calendar days after April 22, 2004; and the Directory described in § 7-1803.03(b) shall be published or made available within 150 calendar days after April 22, 2004.

(d)

The Mayor may promulgate regulations necessary to effect the purposes of this part.

(e)

In any action brought by the District to enforce this part, the District shall be entitled to recover the costs of investigation, expert witness fees, costs of the action, and reasonable attorney fees.

(f)

If a court determines that a person has violated this part, the court shall order any profits, gain, gross receipts, or other benefit derived from the violation to be disgorged and paid to the District. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this part are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of the District.

(g)

(1)

If a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the provisions of this part and of part A of this subchapter conflict and cannot be harmonized, then the provisions of part A of this subchapter shall control.

(2)

(A)

If any section, subsection, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, clause, or phrase of this part causes part A of this subchapter to no longer constitute a Qualifying or Model Statute, as those terms are defined in the Master Settlement Agreement, then that portion of this part shall not be valid.

(B)

If any section, subsection, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, clause, or phrase of this part is for any reason held to be invalid, unlawful, or unconstitutional, that holding shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this part or any part of this part.

Apr. 22, 2004, D.C. Law 15-150, § 8, 51 DCR 2809
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 16, 52 DCR 2638
D.C. Law 15-534, in subsec. (g)(2)(A), validated a previously made technical correction.